Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1018.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 4 and 5 of the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act, are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 4. * * *(a.1) Any person initiating a project involving construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance for which the person has received or will receive public funding or tax incentives from a public agency shall use 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 steel products as herein defined if any steel products are to be used or supplied in the completion of the project. This subsection shall apply to any subcontracts thereunder.* * *Section 5. * * *(a.1) No public agency shall authorize, provide for or make any payments to any person of public funds, grants, tax credits or other tax incentives from a public agency unless, when unidentified steel products are supplied, such person has provided documentation, including, but not limited to, invoices, bills of lading and mill certification that the steel was melted and manufactured in the United States, which establishes that such person has fully complied with such provision. If a steel product is identifiable from its face, such person must submit certification which satisfies the public agency that such person has fully complied with the provision required under section 4. Any such payments made to any person by any public agency which should not have been made as a result of this section shall be recoverable directly from the contractor, subcontractor, manufacturer or supplier who did not comply with section 4 by either such public agency or the Attorney General of Pennsylvania.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1018PN1098 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324